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PRE−CHECK
1.DIAGNOSISSYSTEM
(a) Check the DLC3.
HINT:
Thevehicle’sECMuses ISO9 141−2 forcommunication.The
terminalarrangementof theDLC3complieswith ISO 15031−3
andmatches the ISO9 141−2 format.

Terminal No. Connection/Voltage or Resistance Condition

7 Bus Line/Pulsegeneration During Transmission

4 ChassisGround � BodyGround/ 1 � or less Always

16 BatteryPositive � BodyGround/ � � � � V Always

HINT:
If your display shows UNABLE TO CONNECT TO VEHICLE
whenyouhaveconnected thecableof thehand −held tester to
the DLC3, turned the ignition switch ON and operated the
hand−held tester, there isaproblemon thevehiclesideor tool
side.

S If communication isnormalwhen the tool iscon-
nected to another vehicle, inspect the DLC3 on the
original vehicle.

S If communication isstill notpossiblewhen the tool
is connected to another vehicle, the problem is
probably in the tool itself, so consult the Service De-
partment listed in the tool’s instruction manual.

2. SRS WARNING LIGHT CHECK
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and check that the SRS

warning light comes on.
(b) Check that the SRS warning light goes out after approx.

6 seconds.
HINT:
S Whenthe ignitionswitch isatONand theSRSwarning

light remains on or flashes, the airbag sensor assembly
hasdetectedamalfunctioncode.

S If, afterapprox.6secondshaveelapsed, theSRSwarn-
ing light sometimes comes on even when the ignition
switch is OFF. In this case, a short in the SRS warning light
circuit is possible. Proceed to ”SRS warning light circuit
malfunction” on page DI− 768 .
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3. DTC CHECK (Using diagnosis check wire)
(a) Present troubles codes:

Output the DTC.
(1)Turn the ignitionswitch toON,andwait forapprox.

10seconds.
(2) Using SST, connect terminal TC and CG of the

DLC3.
SST09843 −18040

NOTICE:
Pay attention to the terminal connecting position to avoid
a malfunction.
(b) Past troubles codes:

Output the DTC.
(1) Using SST, connect terminal TC and CG of the

DLC3.
SST09843 −18040
(2) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait for approx.

10seconds.
NOTICE:
Pay attention to the terminal connecting position to avoid
a malfunction.
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(c) Read the DTC.
Read the DTC by counting the blinking times. As an ex-
ample, the blinking patterns of normal, 11 and 31 are
shown in the illustration.

S Nor m al c ode indicat ion ( w/ o past t r ouble
code)
The light blinks 2 times per seconds.

S Normal code indication (w/ past trouble code)
When the past troubles code is stored in the
airbag sensor assembly, the light blinks only
ones a second.

S Malfunction code indication
The first blinking indicates the first DTC. Se-
cond blinking occur s af t er 1 .5− second of
pausing.

If there are 2 or more codes, there will be a 2.5−second pause
between each code. After all the codes are shown, there will be
a 4.0−second pausing, and they will all be repeated.
HINT:
S If 2 or more malfunctions are found, the indication starts

from the smaller numbered code.
S If the lightdoesnotblinkorcomesoutatall, or ifDTCsare

indicated without a connection of the terminals, proceed
to the TC terminal circuit inspection on page DI−773.

4.DTCCHECK(Usinghand −held tester)
(a)Hookup thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b) Read the DTCs by following the prompts on the tester

screen.
HINT:
Please refer to thehand −held testeroperator’smanual for fur-
ther details.
5. DTC CLEARANCE (Not using service wire)
Whenthe ignitionswitch is turnedOFF, thediagnostic trouble
code is cleared.
HINT:
Depending on the DTC, the code might not be cleared by turn-
ing the ignition switch OFF.
In this case, proceed to the next step.
6. DTC CLEARANCE (Using service wire)
(a) Using SST, connect terminal TC and CG.

SST09843 −18040
(b)Disconnect terminalTCofDLC3within 10secondsafter

the DTCs appear, and check if the warning light come on
within 3.0 seconds.

(c) Within 2.0 seconds to 4.0 seconds after the SRS warning
lightcomeon, re −connect the terminalsTCandCGof
DLC3.
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(d)SRSwarning lightgoesoff3.0secondsafter re −connect-
ing the terminal TC and CG. Then disconnect the terminal
TC of DLC3within 2.0 to 4.0 seconds after the SRS warn-
ing light goes off.

(e)Warning lightcomesonwithin3.0secondsafter re −dis-
connecting the terminal TC and CG.

(f) Within 2.0 seconds to 4.0 seconds after the SRS warning
lightcomeon, re −connect the terminalsTCandCGof
DLC3.

(g)SRSwarning lightgoesoff3secondsafter re −connecting
the terminal TC and CG.

(h)Normalcodeappears 1.0secondsafter theSRSwarning
light goes off.

If DTCs are not cleared, repeat the above procedure until the
codes are cleared.
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7. DTC CLEARANCE (Using hand−held tester)
(a) Hook up the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Clear the DTCs by following the prompts on the tester

screen.
HINT:
Please refer to the hand−held tester operation’s manual for fur-
ther details.
8. RELEASE METHOD OF AIRBAG ACTIVATION PRE-

VENTION MECHANISM
An airbag activation prevention mechanism is built into the con-
nector for the squib circuit of the SRS.
As explained in the troubleshooting later, insert a paper with the
same thickness as the male terminal between the terminal and
the short spring to release it (Refer to illustrations on next 4
pages).
CAUTION:
Never release the airbag activation prevention mechanism
on the squib connector.
NOTICE:
S Do not release the airbag activation prevention mech-

anism unless specifically directed by the trouble-
shooting procedure.

S To prevent the terminal and the short spring to be
damaged, always use a paper with the same thick-
ness as the male terminals.
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